Arkansas, session 2025, HB1834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-112-308(a)(25), concerning the
unauthorized use of a temporary cardboard buyer's tag assigned to a dealer,
is amended to read as follows:
(25) Using or permitting the use of a:
(A) temporary Temporary cardboard preprinted paper buyer's
tag assigned to the dealer for any purpose other than permitted under § 27-
14-1705; or
(B) Dealer's extra license plate by an authorized or
unauthorized user for any purpose other than permitted under § 27-14-1704;
and

/s/Holcomb




*MBM173*
04-08-2025 10:28:44 MBM173